Utah statutes.
41-12a-302.   Operating motor vehicle without owner's or operator's security
-- Penalty.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), an owner of a motor vehicle
on which owner's or operator's security is required under Section 41-12a-301,
who operates the owner's vehicle or permits it to be operated on a highway in
this state without owner's security being in effect is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor, and the fine shall be not less than:
(i)  $400 for a first offense; and
(ii)  $1,000 for a second and subsequent offense within three years of a
previous conviction or bail forfeiture.
(b)  A court may waive up to $300 of the fine charged to the owner of a motor
vehicle under Subsection (1)(a)(i) if the owner demonstrates that owner's or
operator's security required under Section 41-12a-301 was obtained subsequent
to the violation but before sentencing.
(2) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (2)(b), any other person who
operates a motor vehicle upon a highway in Utah with the knowledge that the
owner does not have owner's security in effect for the motor vehicle is also
guilty of a class B misdemeanor, and the fine shall be not less than:
(i)  $400 for a first offense; and
(ii)  $1,000 for a second and subsequent offense within three years of a
previous conviction or bail forfeiture.
(b)  A person that has in effect owner's security on a Utah-registered motor
vehicle or its equivalent that covers the operation, by the person, of the
motor vehicle in question is exempt from this Subsection (2).
